Nebraska, session 109, LB342.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 13 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act:
(1) Adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts means the amount equal
to the gross fantasy contest receipts of a fantasy contest operator
multiplied by the location percentage;
(2) Applicant means a fantasy contest operator that submits an
application for licensure under the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection
Act;
(3) Athlete means a professional or amateur competitor in a real-
world sporting event or an organized video game competition that is
regulated by a governing body and that is held between players who play
individually or as teams;
(4) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(5) Disqualifying offense means any felony or any offense involving
gambling;
(6) Entry fee means cash or a cash equivalent that is paid by a
participant in advance of a fantasy contest in order to participate in a
fantasy contest offered by a fantasy contest operator;
(7)(a) Fantasy contest means an online fantasy or simulated game or
contest of skill with an entry fee in which:
(i) The values of all prizes offered to a winning participant are
established and made known to the participant in advance of the contest;
(ii) All winning outcomes reflect the relative knowledge and skill
of the participant;
(iii) The participant assembles a fictional entry or roster of
actual athletes;
(iv) A participant competes for prizes awarded by a fantasy contest
operator based on terms and conditions published by the fantasy contest
operator and made known to the participant in advance of the contest;
(v) Winning outcomes are determined solely by clearly established
-2-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
scoring criteria based on one or more statistical results of the
performance of an individual athlete, including, but not limited to, a
fantasy score; and
(vi) No winning outcome is based on the score, point spread, or any
performance of any single actual team or combination of teams or solely
on any single performance of an individual athlete or player in any
single actual event.
(b) Fantasy contest includes both contests wherein participants
compete against each other and contests wherein only a single participant
competes against a target score set by the fantasy contest operator.
(c) Fantasy contest does not include:
(i) Any fantasy contest in which the participant is not required to
pay an entry fee to a fantasy contest operator; or
(ii) Any fantasy contest:
(A) With rosters whose membership is limited to athletes of a single
sport;
(B) That encompass at least one-half of a sport's regular season of
the athletic activity in which the underlying competition is being
conducted;
(C) In which participants compete against each other; and
(D) In which the fantasy contest operator, if such operator so
chooses, retains an administrative fee not to exceed fifty percent of all
entry fees paid to enter the single season-long contest;
(8) Fantasy contest operator means a person or entity that offers
fantasy contests to members of the public. Fantasy contest operator does
not include an Internet service provider or a provider of mobile data
services merely as a result of that entity's transporting general traffic
that may include a fantasy contest;
(9) Gross fantasy contest receipts means the amount equal to the
total of all entry fees that a fantasy contest operator collects from all
participants less the total of all amounts paid out as prizes to all
-3-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
participants;
(10) Key employee means any executive, employee, agent, or other
individual who has the power to exercise significant influence over
decisions concerning any part of the operation, including:
(a) An officer, director, trustee, partner, or an equivalent
fiduciary;
(b) An individual who holds a direct or indirect ownership interest
of ten percent or more;
(c) An individual who performs the function of a principal executive
officer, principal operating officer, principal accounting officer, or an
equivalent officer;
(d) Any other individual the department determines to have the power
to exercise significant influence over decisions concerning any part of
the operation;
(11) Large fantasy contest operator means a fantasy contest operator
that, at the time of initial or renewed licensure, has adjusted gross
fantasy contest receipts of one million dollars or more for the preceding
twelve calendar months;
(12) Location percentage means the percentage rounded to the nearest
one-tenth of one percent of the total entry fees collected from players
located in the state, divided by the total entry fees collected from all
players in the fantasy contest;
(13) Participant means an individual who participates in a fantasy
contest offered by a fantasy contest operator. Participant does not
include a fantasy contest operator by virtue of doing one or more of the
following: (a) Setting house rules for a contest; (b) assigning a salary
or target score to any eligible athlete or player; (c) accepting an entry
fee from a participant; or (d) awarding or disbursing prizes in
conformance with the Fantasy Contests Consumer Protection Act;
(14) Prohibited participant means an individual who has self-
excluded under section 12 of this act or an athlete, coach, referee,
-4-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
trainer, or team staff when the fantasy contest entry includes an athlete
selection from a sporting event overseen by the same sports governing
body which oversees the athlete, coach, referee, trainer, or team staff
in question;
(15) Sporting event means a real-world athletic event or an
organized video game competition or other event approved by the
department that is regulated by a governing body and that is held between
athletes who play individually or as teams; and
(16) Sports governing body means the organization that prescribes
final rules and enforces codes of conduct with respect to a sporting
event and athletes therein.
Sec. 3. (1) The department shall regulate the conduct of fantasy
contest operators pursuant to the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act.
(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
to carry out the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act. Such initial
rules and regulations shall be adopted and promulgated no later than
January 1, 2026. Any rules and regulations proposed by the department may
be adopted as emergency rules if necessary pursuant to section 84-901.04.
(3) The department shall have the following powers and duties
pursuant to the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act:
(a) Levy and collect all fees, surcharges, and civil penalties and
the tax imposed pursuant to section 9 of this act;
(b) Require fantasy contest operators to implement procedures to
prevent fraud, abuse, money laundering, and collusion;
(c) Verify that fantasy contest operators establish technical and
operational measures to prevent underage participation in a fantasy
contest;
(d) Verify that fantasy contest operators deploy identity
verification procedures, which may require the use of a reputable
independent third party that is in the business of verifying an
individual's personally identifiable information and can detect potential
-5-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
prohibited participants;
(e) Verify that fantasy contest operators employ mechanisms on the
operator's platform that are designed to detect and prevent unauthorized
accounts and to detect and prevent fraud, money laundering, and
collusion;
(f) Require the use of geolocation technology by fantasy contest
operators to verify that a participant is not entering fantasy contests
from a restricted jurisdiction;
(g) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations (i) establishing
compulsive and problem gaming standards for fantasy contest operators
that are consistent with the act, and (ii) governing investigations of
prohibited conduct and referrals to law enforcement entities; and
(h) Exercise any other powers necessary to enforce the provisions of
the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act.
(4) The Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act shall be construed
liberally to promote the general welfare of the public and integrity of
the fantasy sports industry. However, the department shall not adopt
rules or regulations limiting or regulating the rules or administration
of an individual fantasy contest, the statistical makeup of a fantasy
contest, or the digital platform of a fantasy contest operator. Further,
the department shall not in any way limit or restrict the types of
fantasy contests allowed pursuant to the act by labelling any such
contests as sports wagering as defined in section 9-1103.
(5) No licensed fantasy contest operator shall be forced to
surrender or terminate its license prior to the date of expiration of the
license solely by virtue of a change in the rules adopted under the act.
(6) The department and fantasy contest operator licensees may
cooperate with investigations conducted by law enforcement agencies,
including, but not limited to, providing and facilitating the provision
of account-level entry and participation information.
(7) A fantasy contest operator licensee shall make all reasonable
-6-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
efforts to promptly notify the department of any information relating to:
(a) A confirmed breach of the relevant sports governing body's
internal rules and codes of conduct, if provided to the fantasy contest
operator, pertaining to participation in real-money fantasy contests;
(b) Any conduct that corrupts any outcome related to a sporting
event for purposes of financial gain, including match fixing; and
(c) Confirmed illegal activities, including use of funds derived
from illegal activity, entries to conceal or launder funds derived from
illegal activity, multi-accounting, and using false identification.
Sec. 4. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person
shall not offer fantasy contests in this state unless the person is
licensed by the department as a fantasy contest operator.
(2) An applicant for a license issued under the Fantasy Sports
Consumer Protection Act shall submit an application to the department in
a manner prescribed by the department, which shall include the
information required pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. As a
part of such application, an applicant shall submit fingerprints for a
check of such applicant's national criminal history record information
maintained by the Identification Division of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol to determine if the
department has reason to deny the license application by a law
enforcement agency. The fingerprints shall be furnished by (a) the
applicant's officers, directors, and each individual that holds a ten
percent or more ownership interest in the applicant or in shares of the
applicant if a corporation, (b) the managers and members if a limited
liability company, and (c) the partners if a partnership. The
fingerprints shall be accompanied by a signed authorization for the
release of information by the law enforcement agency. The department may
require additional background checks on licensees when they apply for
license renewal, and an applicant convicted of a disqualifying offense
shall not be licensed. This subsection does not require an applicant or
-7-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
individual who has submitted to a national criminal history record
information check in this state or any other state within the twelve
months before submitting the application to resubmit to another criminal
history record information check if the applicant or individual submits
the results of the previous criminal history record information check and
affirms that there has been no material change in the criminal history
since the time of the criminal history record check.
(3) An application to the department for a license as a fantasy
contest operator shall include the following:
(a) The name of the applicant;
(b) The location of the applicant's principal place of business;
(c) The applicant's contact information;
(d) The applicant's social security number or, if applicable, the
applicant's federal tax identification number;
(e) The name and address of each individual that holds a ten percent
or more ownership interest in the applicant or in shares of the
applicant;
(f) The applicant's criminal record, if any, or, if the applicant is
a business entity, on request, any criminal record of an individual who
is a director, officer, or key employee of the applicant or any
individual who has a ten percent or more ownership interest in the
applicant;
(g) Any ownership interest that a director, officer, key employee,
or individual owner of ten percent or more of the applicant holds in a
business that is or was a fantasy contest operator or similar entity in
any jurisdiction;
(h) An identification of any business in which an applicant or a
director, officer, key employee, or individual owner of ten percent or
more of the applicant has an equity interest of five percent or more. If
a business has been identified under this subdivision, documentation
shall be provided showing the state in which the business is incorporated
-8-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
or registered, if applicable;
(i) Whether an applicant, director, officer, key employee, or
individual owner of ten percent or more of the applicant has ever applied
for or been granted any license, registration, or certificate issued by a
licensing authority in this state or any other jurisdiction for a gaming
activity;
(j) Whether an applicant or a director, officer, key employee, or
individual owner of ten percent or more of the applicant has filed or
been served with a complaint or other notice filed by a public body
regarding the delinquency in payment of, or dispute over filings
concerning, the payment of any tax required under federal, state, or
local law, including the amount of tax, the type of tax, the taxing
agency, and the time periods involved;
(k) Information sufficient to show, as determined by the department,
that the applicant can meet the requirements of procedures submitted by
the applicant under the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act and under
any rules adopted and promulgated under the act;
(l) A nonrefundable application fee of five thousand dollars; and
(m) Any other information the department may require.
(4) Upon receipt of a completed application and the required fee,
the department shall conduct the necessary background investigation to
determine if the applicant meets the qualifications for licensure. On
completion of the necessary background investigation, the department
shall either issue a license or deny the application. If the application
for licensure is denied, a statement setting forth the grounds for denial
shall be forwarded to the applicant together with all other documents
relied on by the department, to the extent allowed by law.
(5) A fantasy contest operator offering a fantasy contest to
residents of Nebraska prior to the effective date of this act may
continue to offer such fantasy contest until ninety days after an
application for licensure is made available by the department or, if such
-9-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
applicant submits an initial application within the first ninety days of
an application being made available, until such operator's initial
application for licensure under the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection
Act is approved or rejected by the commission, whichever is later.
(6) A federally recognized Indian tribe that offers fantasy contests
may, but is not required, to contract with a fantasy contest operator for
fantasy contests offered for play. A federally recognized Indian tribe
that offers fantasy contests for play in this state and does not contract
with a fantasy contest operator shall be considered a fantasy contest
operator for purposes of complying with the licensing, reporting, and
regulatory requirements of the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act.
Sec. 5. (1) The operation of a fantasy contest is only lawful when
conducted in accordance with the provisions of the Fantasy Sports
Consumer Protection Act.
(2) A person shall be at least eighteen years of age to participate
in a fantasy contest.
(3) A fantasy contest operator shall only accept an entry from a
person physically located in the state. A fantasy contest operator shall
use a geolocation system to ensure that a participant is physically
present in the state when submitting a fantasy contest entry unless
otherwise authorized by the department.
Sec. 6. (1)(a) The initial license fee for a fantasy contest
operator that operated in the state prior to the effective date of this
act shall be ten percent of its adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts
from the preceding calendar year or five thousand dollars, whichever is
less.
(b) The initial license fee for a fantasy contest operator that did
not operate in the state for at least the twelve months prior to the
effective date of this act shall be five thousand dollars, so long as
such a fantasy sports contest operator agrees to and does remit a
supplemental license fee of ten percent of its adjusted gross fantasy
-10-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
sports contest receipts for the twelve-month period beginning on the date
of licensure less the initial license fee. In the event that the
supplemental license fee would result in a negative number, no refund
shall be issued, and the supplemental license fee shall be deemed to be
zero.
(2) A license as a fantasy contest operator issued by the department
shall remain in effect for four years. The department shall establish a
process for renewal with a renewal fee equal to one percent of the
adjusted gross fantasy contest receipts of such operator for the
preceding four years.
(3) A fantasy contest operator that allows its license to lapse
without requesting an extension of time to file shall resubmit an initial
application. An extension may be granted by the department upon receipt
of a written request.
(4) A fantasy contest operator applying for a license or renewal of
a license may operate during the application period unless the department
has reasonable cause to believe that the fantasy contest operator is or
may be in violation of the provisions of the Fantasy Sports Consumer
Protection Act or any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated under
the act. In such case, the department may require the fantasy contest
operator to suspend the operation of any fantasy contest until the
license is issued or renewed.
Sec. 7. (1) As part of its submission for licensure or renewal, an
applicant shall:
(a) Contract with a certified public accountant to conduct an
independent audit, consistent with generally accepted accounting
principles;
(b) Annually contract with a testing laboratory, certified public
accountant, or other professional service provider, recognized by the
department, to verify compliance with the provisions of the Fantasy
Sports Consumer Protection Act; and
-11-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
(c) Submit to the department a copy of the audit report and a copy
of the compliance report of the testing laboratory, certified public
accountant, or professional service provider.
(2) An initial applicant is not required to submit an audit report
or compliance report until two years following the issuance of a license.
Sec. 8. (1) The department shall investigate all reasonable
allegations of prohibited conduct and refer any allegations it deems
credible to the appropriate law enforcement entity.
(2) The identity of any reporting person shall remain confidential
unless such person authorizes disclosure of the person's identity or
until the allegation of prohibited conduct is referred to law
enforcement.
(3) If the department receives a complaint of prohibited conduct by
an athlete, the department shall notify the appropriate sports governing
body to review the complaint as provided by rule of the department.
Sec. 9. (1) Beginning on July 1, 2026, for the privilege of holding
a license to operate fantasy contests under the Fantasy Sports Consumer
Protection Act, the department shall impose and collect a tax at a rate
of ten percent of the fantasy contest operator's adjusted gross fantasy
contest receipts. The accrual method of accounting shall be used for
purposes of calculating the amount of the tax owed by the licensee. The
fantasy contest operator shall submit to the department, on or before the
last day of each calendar month, a return indicating the amount of tax
due under this section for the previous calendar month as well as any
other information the department shall require and shall remit to the
department payment of the tax due under this section with such return.
(2) The tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for credit as follows: Eighty-five percent to the
General Fund and fifteen percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance
Fund.
Sec. 10. Any person who knowingly violates any provision of the
-12-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act shall be liable for a civil
penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation, not to
exceed ten thousand dollars for violations arising out of the same
transaction or occurrence, which shall accrue to the state, and which may
be recovered in a civil action brought by the department. All money
collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 11. The Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Fund is created.
The fund shall be administered by the department and used for the
administration of the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act. Any license
and application fees collected by the department pursuant to the Fantasy
Sports Consumer Protection Act shall be credited to the Fantasy Sports
Consumer Protection Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 12. (1) Each fantasy contest operator shall include a
statement regarding obtaining assistance with real-money gaming problems
on the operator's portal, website, or computer or mobile application and
on all marketing materials and advertisements of the operator.
(2) An individual may voluntarily prohibit himself or herself from
establishing a fantasy contest account with a fantasy contest operator
under the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act. The department shall
incorporate the voluntary self-exclusion program for fantasy contests
into any existing self-exclusion program that it operates on the
effective date of this act.
(3) If a prohibited participant participates in a fantasy contest,
the fantasy contest operator shall report to the department, at a
minimum, the name of the self-excluded individual, the date of
participation, the amount or value of any money, prizes, or awards
-13-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
forfeited, if any, and any other action taken.
(4) A fantasy contest operator shall not pay any prize or award to a
person who is on the department's prohibited participant list. Any prize
or award won by an individual on the prohibited participant list is
forfeited and shall be donated by the fantasy contest operator to the
problem gaming charities or programs as identified and directed by the
department on a quarterly basis by the twenty-fifth day of the following
month.
(5) A fantasy contest operator shall develop and maintain a program
to mitigate compulsive play and curtail compulsive play, which may be in
conjunction with the department.
Sec. 13. (1) A large fantasy contest operator shall electronically
submit a report, in a searchable format, on all procurement goals and
actual spending for businesses owned by women, minorities, veterans,
indigenous persons, and persons with disabilities and for small business
enterprises in the previous calendar year. Such goals and actual spending
shall be expressed as a percentage of the total work performed by the
large fantasy contest operator. The initial report shall be due one year
after initial licensure by the large fantasy contest operator.
(2)(a) A similar report shall be submitted biannually following the
year in which the initial report was submitted. Such biannual report
shall contain the following information:
(i) An explanation of the plan relating to procurement goals and
actual spending relating to the populations described in subsection (1)
of this section for the next two-year period to increase participation;
(ii) An explanation of the plan to increase such goals;
(iii) The areas of procurement each large fantasy contest operator
plans to seek more participation from in the next two-year period;
(iv) An outline of the plan to alert and encourage potential vendors
to seek business from the large fantasy contest operator;
(v) An explanation of the challenges faced in finding quality
-14-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
vendors;
(vi) A list of the certifications the large fantasy contest operator
recognizes;
(vii) The point of contact for a large fantasy contest operator for
any potential vendor who wishes to do business with the large fantasy
contest operator;
(viii) An explanation for potential vendors of the process of
enrolling with a large fantasy contest operator; and
(ix) Any success stories of the large fantasy contest operator
working with a business owned by any of the populations described in
subsection (1) of this section.
(b) Each biannual report shall include as much state-specific data
as possible. If the large fantasy contest operator does not submit state-
specific data, then such report shall include national data and an
explanation as to why state-specific data could not be submitted.
(c) Each biannual report shall include the rules, regulations, and
definitions used for the procurement goals in the large fantasy contest
operator's report.
Sec. 14. Section 28-1101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1101 As used in this article, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) A person advances gambling activity if, acting other than as a
player, he or she engages in conduct that materially aids any form of
gambling activity. Conduct of this nature includes, but shall not be
limited to, conduct directed toward (a) the creation or establishment of
the particular game, contest, scheme, device, or activity involved, (b)
the acquisition or maintenance of premises, paraphernalia, equipment, or
apparatus therefor, or (c) engaging in the procurement, sale, or offering
for sale within this state of any chance, share, or interest in a lottery
of another state or government whether or not such chance, share, or
-15-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
interest is an actual lottery ticket, receipt, contingent promise to pay,
order to purchase, or other record of such interest except as provided in
the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle
Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, the State
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, or section 9-701;
(2) Bookmaking means shall mean advancing gambling activity by
unlawfully accepting bets from members of the public as a business upon
the outcome of future contingent events;
(3) A person profits from gambling activity if, other than as a
player, he or she accepts or receives money or other property pursuant to
an agreement or understanding with any person whereby he or she
participates or is to participate in the proceeds of gambling activity;
(4) A person engages in gambling if he or she bets something of
value upon the outcome of a future event, which outcome is determined by
an element of chance, or upon the outcome of a game, contest, or
election, or conducts or participates in any fantasy contest, bingo,
lottery by the sale of pickle cards, lottery, raffle, gift enterprise, or
other scheme not authorized or conducted in accordance with the Fantasy
Sports Consumer Protection Act, the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska
County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the
Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle
Act, the State Lottery Act, the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, or section
9-701, but a person does not engage in gambling by:
(a) Entering into a lawful business transaction;
(b) Playing an amusement device or a coin-operated mechanical game
which confers as a prize an immediate, unrecorded right of replay not
exchangeable for something of value;
(c) Conducting or participating in a prize contest; or
(d) Conducting or participating in any fantasy contest, bingo,
lottery by the sale of pickle cards, lottery, raffle, game of chance, or
-16-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
gift enterprise conducted in accordance with the Fantasy Sports Consumer
Protection Act, the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle
Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, the State
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, or section 9-701;
(5) Gambling device means shall mean any device, machine,
paraphernalia, writing, paper, instrument, article, or equipment that is
used or usable for engaging in gambling, whether that activity consists
of gambling between persons or gambling by a person involving the playing
of a machine. Gambling device shall also include any mechanical gaming
device, computer gaming device, electronic gaming device, or video gaming
device which has the capability of awarding something of value, free
games redeemable for something of value, instant-win tickets which also
provide the possibility of participating in a subsequent drawing or
event, or tickets or stubs redeemable for something of value, except as
authorized in the furtherance of parimutuel wagering. Supplies,
equipment, cards, tickets, stubs, and other items used in any fantasy
contest, bingo, lottery by the sale of pickle cards, other lottery,
raffle, game of chance, or gift enterprise conducted in accordance with
the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act, the Nebraska Bingo Act, the
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle
Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and
Raffle Act, the State Lottery Act, the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act, or
section 9-701 are not gambling devices within this definition;
(6) Something of value means shall mean any money or property, any
token, object, or article exchangeable for money or property, or any form
of credit or promise directly or indirectly contemplating transfer of
money or property or of any interest therein, or involving extension of a
service or entertainment; and
(7) Prize contest means shall mean any competition in which one or
more competitors are awarded something of value as a consequence of
-17-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
winning or achieving a certain result in the competition and (a) the
value of such awards made to competitors participating in the contest
does not depend upon the number of participants in the contest or upon
the amount of consideration, if any, paid for the opportunity to
participate in the contest or upon chance and (b) the value or identity
of such awards to be made to competitors is published before the
competition begins.
Sec. 15. Section 28-1105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1105 (1) A person commits the offense of possession of gambling
records if, other than as a player, he or she knowingly possesses any
writing, paper, instrument, or article which is:
(a) Of a kind commonly used in the operation or promotion of a
bookmaking scheme or enterprise and such writing, paper, instrument, or
article has been used for the purpose of recording, memorializing, or
registering any bet, wager, or other gambling information; or
(b) Of a kind commonly used in the operation, promotion, or playing
of a lottery or mutuel scheme or enterprise or other scheme not conducted
pursuant to the Fantasy Sports Consumer Protection Act, the Nebraska
Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery
and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small
Lottery and Raffle Act, the State Lottery Act, the Nebraska Racetrack
Gaming Act, or section 9-701 and such writing, paper, instrument, or
article has been used for the purpose of recording, memorializing, or
registering any bet, wager, or other gambling information not permitted
by such acts or section.
(2) Possession of gambling records in the first degree is a Class II
misdemeanor.
Sec. 16. Section 28-1113, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-1113 Nothing in this article shall be construed to:
-18-

LB342 LB342
2025 2025
(1) Apply to or prohibit wagering on the results of horseraces by
the parimutuel or certificate method when conducted by licensees within
the racetrack enclosure at licensed horserace meetings;
(2) Prohibit or punish the conducting or participating in any
fantasy contest, bingo, lottery by the sale of pickle cards, lottery,
raffle, or gift enterprise when conducted in accordance with the Fantasy
Sports Consumer Protection Act, the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska
County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the
Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle
Act, the State Lottery Act, or section 9-701; or
(3) Apply to or prohibit the operation of games of chance, whether
using a gambling device or otherwise, by authorized gaming operators
within licensed racetrack enclosures or the participation or playing of
such games of chance, whether participated in or played using a gambling
device or otherwise, by individuals twenty-one years of age or older
within licensed racetrack enclosures as provided in the Nebraska
Racetrack Gaming Act.
Sec. 17. Original sections 28-1101, 28-1105, and 28-1113, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-19-